de: Bürstenformat: Hand; Rotierend; Rotofilz; Rotowolle; Sonstiges
vi: Hình dạng bàn chải: Cầm tay; Trục xoay; Nỉ xoay; Len xoay; Khác
sv: Penselformat: Hand; Roterande; Roto-filt; Roto-ull; Övrigt
pl: Format pędzla: Ręczna; Rotacyjna; Roto-filc; Roto-wełna; Inny
zh-TW: 刷子格式: 手動; 旋轉; 旋轉毛氈; 旋轉羊毛; 其他
fr: Format du pinceau: Manuelle; Rotative; Feutre rotatif; Laine rotative; Autre
fi: Harjan malli: Käsi; Pyörivä; Pyörivä huopa; Pyörivä villa; Muu
lt-LT: Šepetėlio formatas: Rankinis; Sukamasis; Roto (veltinis); Roto (vilna); Kitas
zh-CN: 雪板刷形态: 手持式; 旋转式; 旋转毡刷; 旋转羊毛刷; 其他
hr-HR: Format kista: Ručni; Rotacijski; Roto pust; Roto vuna; Ostalo
en: Brush format: Hand; Rotary; Roto felt; Roto wool; Other
ja: ブラシ形式: ハンド; ロータリー; ロトフェルト; ロトウール; その他
es: Formato del cepillo: De mano; Giratorio; Fieltro giratorio; Lana giratoria; Otro
sk-SK: Formát metly: Ručná; Rotačná; Rotačná plstená; Rotačná vlnená; Iné
cs: Formát štětce: Ruční; Rotační; Rotační plstěný; Rotační vlněný; Jiné
pt-PT: Formato da escova: Mão; Rotativo; Feltro rotativo; Lã rotativa; Outro
ru: Формат щетки: Ручная; Роторная; Роторная фетровая; Роторная шерстяная; Другое
sl-SI: Zasnova krtače: Ročno; Rotacijsko; Roto filc; Roto volna; Drugo
tr: Fırça formatı: El; Döner; Döner keçe; Döner yün; Diğer
nb: Børsteformat: Hånd; Roterende; Rotofilt; Rotoull; Annet
bg-BG: Формат на четката: Ръчна; Ротационна; Ротационен филц; Ротационна вълна; Друго
hu: Kefekialakítás: Kézi; Forgó; Forgó filc; Forgó gyapjú; Egyéb
el: Μορφή πινέλου: Χειρός; Περιστροφική; Roto felt (Περιστροφική τσόχα); Roto wool (Περιστροφικό μαλλί); Άλλο
pt-BR: Formato da escova: Manual; Rotativo; Feltro rotativo; Lã rotativa; Outros
da: Børsteformat: Hånd; Roterende; Rotofilt; Rotould; Andet
ko: 브러시 형식: 핸드; 로터리; 로토 펠트; 로토 울; 기타
ro-RO: Format perie: De mână; Rotativ; Pâslă rotativă; Lână rotativă; Altele
nl: Borstel formaat: Hand; Roterend; Roterend vilt; Roterend wol; Overig
it: Formato pennello: A mano; Rotativa; Rotativa in feltro; Rotativa in lana; Altro
th: รูปแบบแปรง: แปรงขัดมือ; แปรงแบบหมุน; แปรงสักหลาดแบบหมุน; แปรงขนสัตว์แบบหมุน; อื่นๆ